uz_Latn_UZ/uz_Latn_UZ.aff
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmizmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmisiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingsanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingsizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganliginglarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingsizlarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmassanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmassizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmaslarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmassizlarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmikanman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmikansan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmikanmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmikansiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmikanmilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmikanmisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirsan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirsiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirsizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirsan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirsiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirsizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirmanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirsanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirmizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirsizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingdirsizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirmanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirsanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirmizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirsizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasdirsizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmidim [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmiding [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmidi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmidik [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmidingiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmidilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmidingizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmidim [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmiding [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmidi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmidik [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmidingiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmidilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmidingizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingsanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingsizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganliginglarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingsizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmassanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmasmizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmassizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmaslarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingmassizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganliging-chi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligini [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligining [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligiga [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligida [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligiman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligisan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligisiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimassan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimas [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimassiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimaslar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimassizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimanmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimisan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimisiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmanmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmisan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmizmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmisiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligisanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligiku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligisizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligilarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligisizlarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimassanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimassizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimaslarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimassizlarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimikanman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimikansan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimikanmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimikansiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimikanmilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimikanmisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirsan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirsiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirsizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirsan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirsiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirsizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirmanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirsanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirmizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirsizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligidirsizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirmanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirsanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirmizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirsizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasdirsizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimidim [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimiding [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimidi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimidik [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimidingiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimidilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimidingizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmidim [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmiding [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmidi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmidik [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmidingiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmidilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmidingizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligisanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligisizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligilarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligisizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimassanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimasmizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimassizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimaslarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimassizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligi-chi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizni [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizning [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizga [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizsan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizsiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizsizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmassan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmas [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmassiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmaslar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmassizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmanmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmisan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmizmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmisiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmanmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmisan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmizmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmisiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizsanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizsizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizlarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizsizlarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmassanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmassizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmaslarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmassizlarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmikanman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmikansan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmikanmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmikansiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmikanmilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmikanmisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirsan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirsiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirsizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirsan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirsiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirsizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirmanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirsanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirmizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirsizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizdirsizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirmanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirsanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirmizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirsizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasdirsizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmidim [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmiding [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmidi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmidik [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmidingiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmidilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmidingizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmidim [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmiding [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmidi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmidik [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmidingiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmidilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmidingizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizsanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizsizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizsizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmassanda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmasmizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmassizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmaslarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimizmassizlarda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligimiz-chi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizni [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizning [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizga [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizdan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizda [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizsan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizsiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizsizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmassan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmas [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmassiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmaslar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmassizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmanmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmisan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmizmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmisiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasmanmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasmisan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasmizmi [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasmisiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasmilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasmisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizsanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizsizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizlarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizsizlarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasmanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmassanku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasmizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmassizku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmaslarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmassizlarku [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmikanman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmikansan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmikan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmikanmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmikansiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmikanmilar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmikanmisizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizdirman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizdirsan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizdir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizdirmiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizdirsiz [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizdirlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizdirsizlar [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasdirman [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasdirsan [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasdir [^gq]
SFX J 0 maganligingizmasdirmiz [^gq]
